src/closed-nob-lex.txt
!LEXICON Particle
! # ;

LEXICON Subjunction
dersom subj ; 
å+IM:å # ;
om  subj ;
fordi subj ;
ifall subj ;
som subj ;
dersom subj ;
hvis subj ;
viss subj ;
at subj ;
for conj ;
om p ;
som p ;
derfor adv ;
hvorfor adv ;


LEXICON subj
 +CS: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
både conj ;
og conj ;
og adv ;
enten conj ;
eller conj ;
samt conj ;
men conj ;

LEXICON conj
 +CC: # ;

LEXICON Interjection
gid ij ;
gid adv ;
uff ij ;
ptro ij ;
ja ij ;
nei ij ;
å ij ;
å f1 ;
oi ij ;
javel ij ;
dæven ij ;
joddu ij ;
jasså ij ;

LEXICON ij
 +Interj: # ;

LEXICON Pronoun

Personal ;
Reflexive ;
Indefinite ;
Interrogative ;


LEXICON Personal 
 jeg+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:jeg # ;
 jeg+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:meg # ;
  du+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:du # ;
  du+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:deg # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:han # ;
 hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:hun # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:han # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:ham # ;
 hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:henne # ;
 den+Pron+Pers+Sg3:den # ; ! Gender? -- no, only as Det Dem (?)
 det+Pron+Pers+Sg3:det # ; ! Gender? -- no, only as Det Dem (?)
  vi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:vi # ;
  vi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:oss # ;
dere+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:dere # ;
dere+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:dere # ;
  de+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:de # ;
  de+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:dem # ;



LEXICON Reflexive 
seg+Pron+Refl+Acc:seg # ;

LEXICON Indefinite
noen+Pron+Indef:noen # ;
ingen+Pron+Indef:ingen # ;


LEXICON Interrogative 
hva+Pron+Interr:hva # ;
hvem+Pron+Interr:hvem # ;

LEXICON Determiner
Demonstrative ;
Possessive ;

LEXICON Demonstrative 
noen+Det+Qnt+Pl:noen # ;
noe+Det+Qnt+Sg+Neu:noe # ;
begge+Det+Qnt+Pl:begge # ;
det+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:det # ;
den+Det+Dem+Sg+MF:den # ;
den+Det+Dem+Pl:de # ;
et+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:et # ;
ett+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:ett # ;
en+Det+Dem+Sg+MF:en # ;
én+Det+Dem+Sg+MF:én # ;
ei+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:ei # ;
hver+Det+Dem+Sg+MF:hver # ;
!hver+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:hver # ;
hver+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:hvert # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Sg+MF:hvilken # ;
!hvilken+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:hvilken # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:hvilket # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Pl:hvilke # ;
hvis+Det+Poss+Qst:hvis # ;
denne+Det+Dem+Sg+MF:denne K ;
!denne+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:denne K ;
dette+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:dette K ;
disse+Det+Dem+Pl:disse K ;
all+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:all # ;
all+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:all # ;
all+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:alt # ;
all+Det+Dem+Pl:alle K ;
slik+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:slik # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:slik # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:slikt # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Pl:slike # ;
samme+Det+Dem:samme # ;
flere+Det+Dem+Pl:flere # ;
mange+Det+Dem+Pl:mange # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:annen # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:anna # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:annen # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:annet # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Pl:andre # ;
selv+Det+Intens:selv # ;
sjøl+Det+Intens:sjøl # ;
eneste+Det+Dem:eneste # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:sånn # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:sånn # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:sånt # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Sg+Pl:sånne # ;


LEXICON Possessive 
di+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:di # ;
din+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:din # ;
dine+Det+Poss+Pl:dine # ;
ditt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:ditt # ;
mi+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:mi # ;
min+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:min # ;
mine+Det+Poss+Pl:mine # ;
mitt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:mitt # ;
si+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:si # ;
sin+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:sin # ;
sine+Det+Poss+Pl:sine # ;
sitt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:sitt # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:vår # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:vår # ;
våre+Det+Poss+Pl:våre # ;
vårt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:vårt # ;

hans+Det+Poss+Msc:hans # ;
hennes+Det+Poss+Fem:hennes # ;
deres+Det+Poss+Pl:deres # ;


LEXICON Numeral 
Textual ;
ARABIC ;
ROMAN ;
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ;

LEXICON Textual
2-9 ;
TEXTTENS ;
TEXTTEENS ;
TEXTHUNDREDS ;
TEXTTHOUSANDS ;
ORDTEXT ;


LEXICON TEXTTHOUSANDS 
1000CONT ;
et 1000CONT ; ! ettusen
to 1000CONT ;
tre 1000CONT ;
fire 1000CONT ;
fem 1000CONT ;
seks 1000CONT ;
sju 1000CONT ;
syv 1000CONT ;
åtte 1000CONT ;
ni  1000CONT ;

LEXICON 1000CONT
tusen numtag ;
tusenog TEXTHUNDREDS ;
tusenog TEXTTENS ;
tusenog TEXTTEENS ;
tusenog TEXTONES ;

LEXICON TEXTHUNDREDS
100CONT ;
ett 100CONT ;
to 100CONT ;
tre 100CONT ;
fire 100CONT ;
fem 100CONT ;
seks 100CONT ;
sju 100CONT ;
syv 100CONT ;
åtte 100CONT ;
ni  100CONT ;

LEXICON 100CONT
hundreog TEXTTENS ;
hundreog TEXTTEENS ;
hundreog TEXTONES ;
hundre numtag ;

LEXICON TEXTTENS

tjue TEXTTENSCONT ;
tyve TEXTTENSCONT ;
tredve numtag ;
tretti TEXTTENSCONT ;
førti TEXTTENSCONT ;
femti TEXTTENSCONT ;
seksti TEXTTENSCONT ;
sytti TEXTTENSCONT ;
søtti TEXTTENSCONT ;
åtti TEXTTENSCONT ;
nitti TEXTTENSCONT ;
hundre TEXTTENSCONT ;

LEXICON TEXTTENSCONT
TEXTONES ; 
numtag ;

LEXICON TEXTTEENS
elleve numtag ;
tolv numtag ;
tretten numtag ;
fjorten numtag ;
femten numtag ;
seksten numtag ;
søtten numtag ;
sytten numtag ;
atten numtag ;
nitten numtag ;

LEXICON TEXTONES
en numtagsg ;
2-9 ;

LEXICON 2-9
to numtag ;
tre numtag ;
fire numtag ;
fem numtag ;
seks numtag ;
sju numtag ;
syv numtag ;
åtte numtag ;
ni numtag ;
ti numtag ;

LEXICON ORDTEXT
første a3 ;
andre a3 ;
tredje a3 ;
fjerde a3 ;
femte a3 ;
sjette a3 ;
sjuende a3 ;
syvende a3 ;
åttende a3 ;
niende a3 ;
tiende a3 ;
ellevte a3 ;
tolvte a3 ;
trettende a3 ;
fjortende a3 ;
femtende a3 ;
sekstende a3 ;
søttende a3 ;
syttende a3 ;
attende a3 ;
nittende a3 ;
tjuende a3 ;
tyvende a3 ;
tredevte a3 ;
trettiende a3 ;
førtiende a3 ;
femtiende a3 ;
sekstiende a3 ;
syttiende a3 ;
søttiende a3 ;
åttiende a3 ;
nittiende a3 ;
hundrede a3 ;

LEXICON numtag
+Det+Pl+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON numtagsg
+Det+Sg+Qnt: # ;



LEXICON ARABIC  !^C^
1  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
2  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
3  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
4  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
5  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
6  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
7  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
8  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
9  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
%0 ARABICLOOP ; !^C^

LEXICON ARABICLOOP      !^C^
        ARABIC ;        !^C^
%-      ARABIC ;          ! 1-2    multipart numbers                                !^C^
%.%-    ARABIC ;          ! 1.-2   multipart numbers                                !^C^
%-%     ARABIC ;          ! 1- 2   multipart numbers                                !^C^
% %-    ARABIC ;          ! 1 -2   multipart numbers                                !^C^
% %-%   ARABIC ;          ! 1 - 2  multipart numbers                                !^C^
% %-%-%  ARABIC ;         ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers                                !^C^
% %-    ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 -    multipart numbers   - "1 - :s" - do we find it?  !^C^
% %-%-  ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 --   multipart numbers                                !^C^
%.      ARABIC ;                                                                    !^C^
%,      ARABIC ;                                                                    !^C^
%:      ARABIC ;                                                                    !^C^
%       ARABIC ;    ! Allowing for "23 500".                                        !^C^
        ARABIC ;    ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char is alt-space)         !^C^
%/      ARABIC ;    ! 24/12                                                         !^C^
+A+Ord:%.   # ;                                                                     !^C^
,%-+Det+Qnt+Pl:,%-   # ;               ! 10,-                                                          !^C^
.%-+Det+Qnt+Pl:,%-   # ;               ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.                          !SUB  !^C^
!%%+Det+Qnt+Pl:%%     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%". !^C^
!% %%+Det+Qnt+Pl:% %% ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.         !^C^
!    +Det+Qnt+Pl:     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters                !^C^
! These three removed due to %% problems.

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER ! blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer? !^C^
     ARABICCASE ; ! This is the 1984s case.                     !^C^
 :%: ARABICCASE ; ! This is the 1984:s case.                    !^C^
 :%' ARABICCASE ; ! This is the 1984's case.                    !^C^
 :%- ARABICCASE ; ! This is the 1984-s case.                    !^C^



LEXICON ARABICCASE                                    !^C^
f # ;     ! s. 123f.                             !^C^
ff # ;     ! s. 123ff.                           !^C^
b # ;     ! § 123b                            !^C^
c # ;     ! § 123c                            !^C^
d # ;     ! § 123d                            !^C^
e # ;     ! § 123e                            !^C^
  # ;                                          !^C^
 R ; ! 1800-tallet

! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN                                !^C^
 ROM-THOUSAND ;                             !^C^
 ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !^C^
 ROM-TEN ;                                 !^C^
 ROM-TWO-NINE ;                                 !^C^
 ROM-ONE-BARE ; ! singleton I              !^C^

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND                          !^C^
 M ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                     !^C^
 MM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                     !^C^
 MMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                     !^C^
 MMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                 !^C^
 MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                 !^C^

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG                    !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                             !^C^
 ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !^C^
 ROM-SPLIT    ;                             !^C^

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED                            !^C^
 C ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CD ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 D ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 DC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 DCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CM ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG                        !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                             !^C^
 ROM-TEN ;                                 !^C^
 ROM-SPLIT ;                             !^C^

LEXICON ROM-TEN                                !^C^
 X ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 XX ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 XXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 XL ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 L ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 LX ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 LXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 XC ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG                            !^C^
 ROMNUMTAG ;                             !^C^
 ROM-ONE ;                                 !^C^
 ROM-SPLIT ;                             !^C^

LEXICON ROM-ONE                                !^C^
 ROM-ONE-ONLY ;
 ROM-TWO-NINE ;

LEXICON ROM-TWO-NINE
 II ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 III ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 IV  ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 V ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 VI ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 VII ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 VIII ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 IX ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^

LEXICON ROM-ONE-ONLY
 I ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^

LEXICON ROM-ONE-BARE
 I NON-ONE-TAG ; ! to avoid I Det Pl

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG                            !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                             !^C^
! +N: ROMNUMTAG ;                         !^C^ !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
 ROM-SPLIT ;                             !^C^

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like "Kapihtal II-IV".
! We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and get the +Det+Qnt+Pl tag), or we may
! send them through a second loop, identical to the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica
! are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases
! like "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would do the
! trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT                            !^C^
 :%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc.                    !^C^


! Here goes loop 2.
